Utah statutes.
17D-2-203.   Local building authority board of directors.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the members of the governing body of the creating local entity constitute the authority board of the local building authority created by the creating local entity.

(2)  An authority board may be referred to as a board of trustees.

(3) (a)  For a local building authority whose creating local entity is a county that operates under the county commission form of government under Section 17-52-501, two members of the authority board may appoint an elected officer of the county to serve temporarily as a member of the authority board if the other authority board member:

(i)  is, as a member of the county commission, placed on paid administrative leave under Section 17-16-10.5;

(ii)  is unable to serve due to a disability;

(iii)  has a conflict of interest with respect to a matter before the authority board that disqualifies the authority board member or causes the member to abstain from participating in action on that matter; or

(iv)  is unable for any other reason to serve temporarily on the authority board or to participate in a matter before the board.

(b)  An elected county officer appointed to an authority board under Subsection (3)(a) may serve only until the condition under Subsection (3)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) causing the need for the appointment is no longer present.

